Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1875.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1709(a)(2)(i) introductory paragraph and (iii) and (7)(i) and (c) of the act of June 24, 1931 (P.L.1206, No.331), known as The First Class Township Code, are amended and subsection (a)(2) and (7) are amended by adding subparagraphs to read:Section 1709. Tax Levies.--(a) The board of commissioners may levy taxes by resolution for taxes levied at the same rate as or a rate lower than the previous fiscal year, and by ordinance if the tax rate increases from the previous fiscal year, upon all property and upon all occupations within the township made taxable for township purposes and subject to valuation and assessment by the county assessment office, for 12345678910111213141516171819 the following purposes and at the following rates:* * *(2) (i) An annual tax not exceeding [three] ten mills for the purpose of:* * *(iii) If an annual tax for the purposes specified in this clause is proposed to be set at a level higher than [three] ten mills the question shall be submitted to the voters of the township, and the county board of elections shall frame the question in accordance with the election laws of the Commonwealth for submission to the voters of the township.(iv) This clause shall not apply to an eligible township as that term is defined in section 8011 of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.343, No.176), known as "The Fiscal Code."* * *(7) (i) An annual tax not exceeding [one-half mill] five mills for the purpose of supporting ambulance, rescue and other emergency services serving the township, except as provided in [subsection (c)] subparagraph (iii).* * *(iii) If an annual tax for the purposes specified in this clause is proposed to be set at a level higher than five mills, the question shall be submitted to the voters of the township, and the county board of elections shall frame the question in accordance with the election of laws of the Commonwealth for submission to the voters of the township.(iv) This clause shall not apply to eligible townships as that term is defined in section 8012 of "The Fiscal Code."* * *[(c) The tax for supporting ambulance and rescue squads 20250HB1875PN2329 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 serving the township shall not exceed the rate specified in subsection (a)(7) except when the question is submitted to the voters of the township in the form of a referendum which will appear on the ballot in accordance with the election laws of the Commonwealth, in which case the rate shall not exceed three mills. The county board of elections shall frame the question to be submitted to the voters of the township in accordance with the election laws of the Commonwealth.]Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1875PN2329 - 3 - 123456789